Utah statutes.
76-6-502.   Possession of forged writing or device for writing -- Penalty.
Any person who, with intent to defraud, knowingly possesses any writing that
is a forgery as defined in Section 76-6-501, or who with intent to defraud
knowingly possesses any device for making any writing that is a forgery as
defined in Section 76-6-501, is guilty of a third degree felony.
